Mississippi, session 2026, SB2168.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of any money in the Capital Expense Fund not otherwise appropriated, to Pascagoula-Gautier School District for the purpose of defraying costs associated with the expansion and upgrades to its career and technical education program for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027 $ 250,000.00. SECTION 2.  The money appropriated in this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the Capital Expense Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.